California statutes. Education Code
(h) “Stackable credential” means a part of a sequence of credentials that can be accumulated over time and move an individual along a career pathway or up a career ladder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 843, Sec. 2.   (AB 2885)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

75003.

(a) The California Online Community College established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 75001 shall be under the administration of the board of governors.

(b) In furtherance of subdivision (a), the board of governors shall do all of the following:

(1) Establish policies for, and approve, current and long-range academic and facilities plans and programs and promote orderly growth and development of the California Online Community College. In so doing, the board of governors shall, as required by law, establish policies for, develop, and approve comprehensive plans.

(2) Establish policies for and approve courses
 of instruction and educational programs.

(3) Establish academic standards, probation, dismissal, and readmission policies, and graduation requirements not inconsistent with the minimum standards adopted by the board of governors.

(4) Employ and assign all personnel not inconsistent with the minimum standards adopted by the chief executive officer appointed pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 75005, and establish employment practices, salaries, and benefits for all employees not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

(5) To the extent authorized by law, determine and control the college’s operational and capital outlay budgets.

(6) Manage and control the college’s property. The board of governors may contract for the procurement of goods and
 services as authorized by law.

(7) Establish procedures that are consistent with minimum standards otherwise established by the board of governors to ensure faculty, staff, and students have the opportunity to express their opinions at the campus level, to ensure that these opinions are given every reasonable consideration, to ensure the right to participate effectively in college governance, and to ensure the right of the college’s academic senate to make recommendations in the areas of curriculum and academic standards. The California Online Community College may establish procedures enabling the use of a digital format, or formats.

(8) Establish rules and regulations governing student conduct.

(9) Establish student fees as it is required to establish by law, and, in its discretion, fees as it is authorized to
 establish by law.

(10) In its discretion, receive and administer gifts, grants, and scholarships.

(11) Provide auxiliary services as deemed necessary to achieve the purposes of the community college.

(12) Within the general framework provided by law, determine the college’s academic calendar, including the holidays it will observe. Notwithstanding Section 84890, the college may enable the offering of courses under a flexible calendar. Notwithstanding any other law, in recognition of the ability to adopt a flexible academic calendar, the board of governors shall also have the flexibility to utilize an alternative definition of “academic year” for purposes of this part.

(13) Hold and convey property for the use and benefit of the college.

(14) Participate in the consultation process otherwise established by the board of governors for the development and review of policy proposals.

(c) In carrying out the powers and duties specified in subdivision (b) or other provisions of statute, the board of governors shall have full authority to adopt rules and regulations that are necessary and proper to executing these prescribed functions and may, as applicable, use a digital format, or formats. Any action taken pursuant to this subdivision by the board of governors is exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act, as defined in Section 11370 of the Government Code.

(d) Wherever in this section or any other statute a power is vested in the board of governors, the board of governors, by majority vote, may adopt a rule delegating the power to the college’s chief
 executive officer or any other employee or committee as the board of governors may designate. However, the board of governors shall not delegate any power that is expressly made nondelegable by statute. Any rule delegating authority shall prescribe the limits of the delegation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75003.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that all students with disabilities enrolled in the California Online Community College be entitled to receive support services and educational accommodations so that they can participate in and benefit from the California Online Community College equal to those students without disabilities. It is the further intent that all support services and educational accommodations made available to students with disabilities at the other community colleges be made equally available to students with disabilities enrolled in the California Online Community College.

(b) The board of governors shall do all of the following:

(1) Ensure the college is in compliance with
 statutory provisions regarding access for individuals with disabilities, including, but not necessarily limited to, Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 67300) of Part 40 of Division 5, and Section 84850. This duty shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the creation of a Disabled Students Programs and Services program within the California Online Community College with staff able to assist students with disabilities who are eligible for academic adjustments, auxiliary aids, services, and instruction that may be necessary for equal access to the general activities, programs, and classes offered by the California Online Community College and any other services specified in Section 67311.

(2) Ensure the California Online Community College’s use of electronic technology is in compliance with the accessibility requirements of state and federal electronic and information technology policy and statutes, including Sections 7405 and 11135 of
 the Government Code; Section 508 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794d), as amended and the regulations implementing that act set forth in Part 1194 of Title 36 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Appendices A, C, and D of that part; and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), no later than December 31, 2020. In carrying out this duty, the board of governors shall ensure electronic technology used by the California Online Community College has undergone user testing by persons with disabilities for the purpose of assessing compliance with the aforementioned requirements.

(3) Ensure that the California Online Community College’s use of instructional resources, including, but not necessarily limited to, textbooks and other digital or printed course materials, is in compliance with Sections 66406, 66406.7, 66406.9, 67302, and 67302.5, and any other provisions regarding the
 accessibility, availability, and affordability of such materials.

(4) Establish a complaint procedure for disabled California Online Community College employees, students, and members of the public to register complaints about accessibility services required pursuant to this section and for resolving the complaints. In any case where a complaint is founded on the failure of the California Online Community College to meet the compliance requirements of this section, the California Online Community College shall provide, upon request of the complainant, an immediate accommodation to meet the needs of the complainant caused by the compliance failure. The California Online Community College shall maintain a summary of the complaints received and the resolution of the complaints including any accommodations made due to the lack of compliance.

(5) Report to the Legislature and the
 Department of Finance on compliance with this section at each reporting interval specified for startup milestones specified in subdivision (b) of Section 75011.

(c) This section does not limit the rights of any person to pursue any remedies or causes of action that they may have under any state or federal law to enforce compliance with those laws or the obligations stated in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 86.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

75004.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 72000, the California Online Community College may sue and be sued, and shall act in accordance with Section 75003.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 72000, the name of the California Online Community College is the property of the board of governors. No person shall, without permission of the board, use the name, or any abbreviation of the name, or any name of which these words are a part, in any of the following ways:

(1) To designate any business, social, political, religious, or other organization, including, but not necessarily limited to, any corporation, firm, partnership, association, group, activity or enterprise.

(2) To imply, indicate or otherwise suggest that any organization, or any product or service of the organization is connected or affiliated with, or is endorsed, favored or supported by, or is opposed by one or more California community colleges, the board of governors, or the chancellor’s office.

(3) To display, advertise, or announce these names publicly at or in connection with any meeting, assembly, or demonstration, or any propaganda, advertising, or promotional activity of any kind which has for its purpose or any part of its purpose the support, endorsement, advancement, opposition or defeat of any strike, lockout, or boycott or of any political, religious, sociological, or economic movement, activity, or program.

(c) Nothing in this section shall interfere with or restrict the right of any person to make a true
 and accurate statement in the course of stating his or her experience or qualifications for any academic, governmental, business, or professional credit or enrollment, or in connection with any academic, governmental, professional or other employment whatsoever.

(d) Meetings conducted by the board of governors on items that are related to the California Online Community College shall be conducted separately from the other statutory functions of the board of governors, and shall be subject to the same public meeting requirements as apply to community college districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75005.

(a) The requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 72022) of Chapter 1 of Part 45 shall not apply to the board of governors in fulfilling its duties related to the California Online Community College.

(b) The Legislature declares that the board of governors, in carrying out its duties pursuant to Section 70901 and Article 2 (commencing with Section 71020.5) of Part 44, is expressly determined to not have a conflict of interest in the administration of the California Online Community College.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 78100) of Part 48, the board of governors may instead provide access to internet-based library services and materials or by contractual arrangements
 with other entities.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the board of governors may authorize the chancellor, or designate members with the appropriate skills and experience, including those necessary to guide the formation of a new entity, to exercise any powers or responsibilities or to take any official actions with respect to the management of the college, including any of the college’s assets, contracts, expenditures, facilities, funds, personnel, or property.

(2) If the board of governors exercises this authority, the chancellor, or the designees of the board of governors, may appoint a chief executive officer to manage the California Online Community College. The chief executive officer shall have served in a similar capacity prior to the establishment of the California Online Community College and shall have expertise in the development and
 operation of online offerings at a public or nonprofit institution, or shall have relevant qualifications to serve as the chief executive officer of the California Online Community College. The chief executive officer shall meet the minimum qualifications for service as an academic administrator in the California Community Colleges.

(3) A chief executive officer appointed under this subdivision shall serve at the pleasure of the board of governors.

(4) A chief executive officer appointed pursuant to this section is authorized to do all of the following:

(A) Develop fiscal policies and practices for the operation of the California Online Community College.

(B) Enter into agreements on behalf of the California Online Community College.

(C) In consultation with the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, establish an advisory council process to advise the chief executive officer on issues related to the California Online Community College. The advisory process shall involve representatives from boards of trustees of community college districts, represented employees of the California Online Community College, and students attending the online college. A participant in the advisory process shall not receive any compensation or benefits for the participant’s services.

(D) Consistent with the requirements of the terms of the contract established pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 70901, hire sufficient staff, with appropriate preparation and experience, to provide the functions necessary to support the college’s mission and purpose.

(E) Hire sufficient numbers of qualified faculty that meet the minimum qualifications established by the college, with appropriate preparation and experience to provide online instructional design and technology-supported student supports to achieve the college’s mission and purpose.

(F) Manage and control the operations of the college.

(5) In the event of a vacancy in the chief executive officer position, the chancellor shall temporarily assume all of the powers and duties of the chief executive officer until another chief executive officer can be appointed pursuant to this section.

(6) The board of governors, or its authorized designees, may contract with the Foundation for California Community Colleges for the purpose of providing administrative support
 for the college’s startup functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 87.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

75007.

(a) The college shall be developed and guided by principles and procedures established by the chancellor’s office, as referenced in Section 75001.

(b) (1) The college shall seek accreditation and meet requirements for students to become eligible for federal and state financial aid.

(A) The college shall provide the Department of Finance and the Legislature with all of the following:

(i) An accreditation plan that, at a minimum, identifies an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education from which the college will seek accreditation, and outlines the process by which
 the college will achieve accreditation candidacy or preaccreditation by April 1, 2022, and full accreditation by April 1, 2025. This plan shall be provided on or before April 1, 2021.

(ii) Evidence of having achieved accreditation candidacy or preaccreditation from an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education on or before April 1, 2022.

(iii) Evidence of having obtained full accreditation from an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education on or before April 1, 2025.

(2) While the college is seeking accreditation, the Workforce Development Board and the Employment Development Department shall determine whether the programs offered by the online college have job market value to California industries by utilizing existing programmatic review processes.

(3) The college shall explore a process for allowing students to retroactively obtain credit units upon demonstrated mastery of competencies for programs completed while the college was seeking accreditation. It is the intent of the Legislature that the college reimburse students for any fees charged if the college fails to meet accreditation standards.

(4) The college shall inform potential and enrolled students regarding the implications of taking courses prior to accreditation and how the college will help students rectify this issue in the future.

(c) In meeting the requirements of paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 75003, the California Online Community College shall comply with collective bargaining pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 70901. It is the intent of the Legislature that
 faculty recruitment efforts for the college will focus on California residents who meet the minimum qualifications to be employed at a California community college, or individuals with experience within the California Community Colleges system.

(d) The college shall be subject to the same competitive bidding and state contracting requirements that apply to California community college districts.

(e) Curricular issues, such as establishment of enrollment caps for courses, shall be subject to the same approval processes that apply to California community college districts. The curriculum developed by the California Online Community College and its faculty shall have the same protections granted to all curriculum developed by other California Community Colleges.

(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that any
 general-purpose apportionment apportioned to the college be subject to the regulatory frameworks of shared governance pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 70902 and the Full-Time Faculty Obligation Number established in Section 51025 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75008.

(a) The college shall develop a Research and Development Unit that is student-centered and focused on the science of learning to ensure that the technology used by the college is working for the communities it is intended to serve.

(b) The Research and Development Unit shall be focused on leveraging current and future learning sciences technology, assessing data metrics within the technological infrastructure to gauge student progress in a course or pathway, informing instructional and support strategies, and improving on the functionality of the underlying technology.

(c) The Research and Development Unit shall focus on using technology, data science, behavioral science, machine
 learning, and artificial intelligence to build out student supports, such as, but not limited to, a virtual help desk which uses technology to respond to commonly asked questions from students at any hour of the day and week.

(d) The Research and Development Unit shall share the data, metrics, and findings with the college’s faculty, administrators, and technologists to inform and evolve better teaching and student support practices.

(e) The Research and Development Unit shall regularly collaborate with the Digital Innovation and Infrastructure Division of the chancellor’s office to ensure integration, interoperability, and, where possible, use open standards.

(f) Insights from the Research and Development Unit shall be shared across the California Community Colleges through existing professional development channels
 to support campuses in accelerated adoption of demonstrated advancements in teaching, learning, and student supports throughout the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75009.

(a) By July 1, 2019, the college shall be expected to, at a minimum, meet the following milestones:

(1) Fully develop a seven-year implementation plan, validate a business plan, and develop three program pathways designed in partnership with employers and industry groups.

(2) Develop internal business processes and personnel policies, such as hiring, salaries, and evaluations, and establish outcomes goals including the classifications necessary to support instructional development, and activities and other elements of the student experience.

(3) Map the student experience, including, but not necessarily limited to,
 recruiting, onboarding, transcriptions, instructional experience, billing, entry into internship if applicable to the student’s programs, and entry into jobs.

(4) Develop an accreditation plan.

(5) Create a statewide outreach plan, which includes working with immigrant groups and community-based organizations to reach the target population of working learners and help design educational opportunities that work for these learners.

(6) Define the duties for instructional support, program development, and other student experience activities.

(7) Establish a process for the recognition of prior learnings into the student onboarding experience.

(8) Plan to begin enrolling students by the last
 quarter of 2019.

(b) By July 1, 2021, the college shall be expected to, at a minimum, meet all of the following milestones:

(1) Incorporate student feedback to improve the college’s instruction, technology, and student support services.

(2) Design and validate at least three additional program pathways, including coordinating the creation of new content.

(3) Apply for accreditation from an accreditor recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(c) By July 1, 2023, the college shall be expected to, at a minimum, meet all of the following milestones:

(1) Enroll students into the college’s program pathways.

(2) Incorporate student feedback to improve the college’s instruction, technology, and student support services.

(3) Design and validate at least 10 additional program pathways, including coordinating the creation of new content.

(4) For every 10 pathways offered by the college, at least one pathway shall be developed in collaboration with a traditional community college.

(d) By July 1, 2025, the college shall be expected to, at a minimum, meet the following milestones:

(1) Enroll students into the college’s program pathways.

(2) Incorporate student feedback to improve the college’s instruction, technology, and student support
 services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75010.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the college may establish an affordable fee structure. The college shall establish a fee structure that is equivalent to or less than the fees charged by traditional community colleges. The chief executive officer of the college shall notify, in writing, the Director of Finance and the Legislature, not less than 60 days prior to the effective date of any fee structure established under this subdivision. The notification shall contain, but not necessarily be limited to, the amount or amounts of the fees proposed to be charged. Notification to the Legislature under this subdivision shall comply with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Regardless of the college’s fee structure,
 enrolled students shall be eligible for fee waivers that are consistent with the fee waiver goals of the California College Promise Grants authorized pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 76300) of Chapter 2 of Part 47 and California College Promise fee waivers authorized pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 76396) of Chapter 2 of Part 47.

(2) Regardless of the college’s fee structure, students exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 76140) of Chapter 1 of Part 47 shall be eligible for tuition and fee waivers pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that students enrolled in the college be eligible to participate in the Cal Grant program if the student otherwise meets the applicable statutory and regulatory requirements of the program.

(d) (1) One-time funds appropriated in Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2018 in support of the college shall be expended to support the college’s start-up costs. Start-up costs may include support for activities, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Roadmap development and capital investments for scalable technology infrastructure development to support the college’s instruction, technological support, continuous improvement modeling, and administrative functions.

(B) Design and development of the Research and Development Unit that may include fully-supported virtual and mobile labs in order to assess learning science, as well as demonstration pilots to test and refine technology and program development to ensure greater effectiveness and scalability.

(C) Establishment of key partnerships with entities with physical presence to provide in-person supports, such as libraries and community college labs and facilities.

(D) Support for the development of core functions, such as mapping the student experience, developing and testing a new and experimental fee model, establishing a student outreach plan, and establishing key employer partners.

(E) Development of a seven-year business plan with key milestones, indicators, and outcomes.

(F) Preparation for and development of applications to seek accreditation.

(G) Establishment of business processes, legal support, development of initial and long-term staffing plan, personnel policies and procedures, establishment of responsive metrics, and
 indicators driving student success to inform design.

(H) Scaling efforts over the seven-year startup period.

(2) Ongoing funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act in support of the college shall be expended to support the college’s ongoing operations. Ongoing costs may include support for activities, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(A) Licensing and maintenance for use of technology and related tools.

(B) Professional development and training, particularly for faculty and staff in student-facing support roles.

(C) Continued assessment of student program pathways, including validation, content development and improvements, and partnership development.

(D) Ongoing costs associated with salaries and benefits, facilities, supplies, and incidentals.

(E) Other administrative functions of the college.

(e) The California Online Community College shall be eligible to claim general apportionment funding pursuant to the formula established in Section 84750.5 or any successor section.

(1) Consistent with the Student-Focused Funding Formula established pursuant to Section 84750.4, the district would be eligible for supplemental grants and student success incentive grants.

(2) For the first three years in which the district claims apportionments funding, the district’s student success incentive grant metrics may be based on the statewide average for
 all other community college districts.

(3) For purposes of computing the District’s apportionments funding, growth in enrollment for the district will be computed separately from the other California Community Colleges. It is the intent of the Legislature that apportionments for enrollment growth funding for the district be appropriated separately from apportionments enrollment growth funding appropriated in support of all other California Community Colleges.

(f) Of the funds appropriated in support of the college, no Proposition 98 General Fund moneys shall be used to support the state operations of the Chancellor’s Office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75011.

(a) The college shall be held to at least the same accountability measures and key performance indicators developed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges that are applicable to all other campuses of the California Community Colleges.

(b) In addition, the college shall report to the Legislature and the Department of Finance on all of the following measures:

(1) The college shall report on startup milestones, including the number of designed program pathways, by August 1, 2019.

(2) The college shall report on startup milestones,
 including student enrollment and the number of designed program pathways, by August 1, 2020.

(3) The college shall report on startup milestones, including student enrollment, the number of designed program pathways, and student outcomes, by August 1, 2021. This report shall serve as a comprehensive status report on the college’s activities and outcomes, including information on student employment and earning gains after completion of programs, other student success metrics identified by the Research and Development Unit, the number of faculty and staff employed by the college, and a qualitative description of the college’s efforts and progress to reach and serve working adults.

(4) The college shall report on startup milestones, including student enrollment, the number of designed program pathways, student outcomes, progress on transition planning for the scaling phase, and a
 qualitative description of any innovative teaching and student support practices and technologies developed by the college’s faculty and staff, by August 1, 2022, and August 1 of each year thereafter.

(c) By January 1, 2026, the college shall also be assessed by an independent evaluator contracted by the board of governors. The independent evaluator shall assess the progress of program production, relationships with industry partners, student success, and the like.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75012.

(a) The chancellor’s office shall conduct a review of the process used to calculate noncredit and career development college preparation rates, and make recommendations to the board of governors on or before January 1, 2019, on how that process may be modified to encourage the use and development of competency-based courses and programs.

(b) The chancellor’s office shall conduct a review of the statewide approval process to offer online courses under a flexible calendar, and make recommendations to the board of governors on or before January 1, 2019.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 18.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

75013.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall develop recommendations for equating enrollment in competency-based education programs to full-time equivalent students for the purposes of generating funding. The chancellor’s office shall convene a workgroup of experts, including experts in competency-based education, state funding models, workforce program funding models, cost-based models, alternate funding models, such as subscription-based models, and enrollment funding, to support the chancellor’s office in developing its recommendations. These recommendations shall apply to competency-based education at community college districts systemwide, including the California Online Community College. The chancellor’s office shall update the Legislative Analyst’s Office and the
 Department of Finance periodically throughout the workgroup’s process. On or before October 1, 2028, the chancellor’s office shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, these recommendations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance. These recommendations shall be used to inform future funding decisions.

(b) As part of the Credit for Prior Learning Initiative, the chancellor’s office, in partnership with the Academic Senate of the California Community Colleges, shall make credit for prior learning recommendations for each program offered by the California Online Community College and similar programs offered by other community colleges, including programs that prepare students for industry certifications. The amount of credit for prior learning recommended under this subdivision for each program or industry certification shall be the same systemwide for all community colleges, including the
 California Online Community College. On or before July 1, 2027, the chancellor’s office shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, these recommendations to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance. Community colleges are strongly encouraged to award students credit for prior learning consistent with these recommendations.

(c) (1) Commencing with the 2026–27 fiscal year, the California Online Community College shall submit data to the chancellor's office’s management information system on the same reporting schedule and using the comparable data elements that apply to noncredit programs at other community college districts, with modifications as agreed to by the chancellor’s office to account for competency-based education programs. The data shall be provided separately for each educational program offered by the California Online Community College and in a combined format
 encompassing all programs offered. Where applicable, the data shall be measured in a manner consistent with any state requirements enacted for the federal Workforce Pell Grant program.

(2) The data provided to the chancellor’s office under paragraph (1) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Student headcount.

(B) The demographics of enrolled students.

(C) The number of awards completed, by award type.

(D) The median times to program completion, the share of students completing within that time, and the share of students completing within 150 percent of that time, aligned with accreditation standards.

(E) To the extent possible, the number of students who complete a program and obtain employment and the job placement rate measured within 180 days after completion of the program.

(F) The median earnings of program completers.

(G) The change in employment and earnings from before program entry to after program completion.

(H) The number and share of students who subsequently enrolled in a credit program at another community college district or other postsecondary educational institution.

(3) The chancellor’s office shall publicly display the data specified in paragraph (2). To the extent practicable, the chancellor’s office shall display that data in formats and dashboards consistent with those used for other community college districts,
 while also incorporating additional measures necessary to accurately reflect the California Online Community College’s competency-based direct assessment and workforce-focused model. Where applicable, the California Online Community College shall be included in statewide aggregate noncredit enrollment and outcomes figures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 14.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 47. STUDENTS [76000. - 76407.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [76000. - 76143.]



  ARTICLE 1. Admission of Students [76000. - 76004.]

76000.

The governing board of a community college district shall admit to the community college any California resident, and may admit any nonresident, possessing a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof.

The governing board may admit to the community college any apprentice, as defined in Section 3077 of the Labor Code, who, in the judgment of the governing board, is capable of profiting from the instruction offered.

The governing board may by rule determine whether there shall be admitted to the community college any other person who is over 18 years of age and who, in the judgment of the board, is capable of profiting from the instruction offered. If the governing board determines to admit other persons, those persons shall be admitted as provisional students and thereafter shall be required to comply with the rules and regulations prescribed by the board of governors pertaining to the scholastic achievement and other standards to be met by provisional or probationary students, as a condition to being readmitted in any succeeding semester. This paragraph shall not apply to persons in attendance in special classes and programs established for adults pursuant to Section 78401 or to any persons attending on a part-time basis only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 88.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

76001.

(a) The governing board of a community college district may admit to any community college under its jurisdiction as a special part-time or full-time student in any session or term any student who is eligible to attend community college pursuant to Section 48800, 48800.5, or 52620.

(b) If the governing board denies a request for a special part-time or full-time enrollment at a community college, the board shall record its findings and the reasons for denial of the request in writing within 60 days. The written recommendation and denial shall be issued at the next regularly scheduled board meeting that falls at least 30 days after the request has been submitted.

(c) The attendance of a
 student at a community college as a special part-time or full-time student pursuant to this section is authorized attendance, for which the community college shall be credited or reimbursed pursuant to Sections 48802, 52621, and 76002. Credit for courses completed shall be at the level determined to be appropriate by the school district and community college district governing boards.

(d) For purposes of this section, a special part-time student may enroll in up to, and including, 11 units per semester, or the equivalent thereof, at the community college.

(e) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the governing board of a community college district shall assign a low enrollment priority to special part-time or full-time students described in subdivision (a) in order to ensure that these students do not displace regularly admitted
 students.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to a student attending a middle college high school as described in Section 11300, if the student is seeking to enroll in a community college course that is required for the student’s middle college high school program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 528, Sec. 2.   (SB 554)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

76001.5.

(a) Courses offered through a dual enrollment program offered by the local educational agency, with an agreement with an institution of higher education, shall be deemed dual credit courses.

(b) A dual credit course offered pursuant to subdivision (a) may be counted simultaneously toward both of the following:

(1) High school credit on an official transcript from the participating local educational agency.

(2) Postsecondary credit on an official transcript at the participating institution of higher education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 131.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

76002.
